ru: Тип связи домофона: Только аудио; Видео; Другой
ja: インターコム通信タイプ: 音声のみ; ビデオ; その他
sk-SK: Typ obojsmernej komunikácie: Iba audio; Video; Iné
lt-LT: Domofono ryšio tipas: Tik garso; Vaizdo; Kita
zh-TW: 對講機通訊類型: 僅音訊; 視訊/影音; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta komunikacije interfona: Samo audio; Videoveza; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип комуникация на домофона: Само аудио; Видео; Други
fi: Puhelinjärjestelmän viestintätyyppi: Vain ääni; Video; Muu
hu: Kaputelefon-kommunikáció típusa: Csak hang; Videó; Egyéb
es: Tipo de comunicación del intercomunicador: Solo audio; Video; Otros
tr: İnterkom iletişim tipi: Yalnızca ses; Video; Diğer
th: ประเภทการสื่อสารอินเตอร์คอม: เฉพาะเสียง; วิดีโอ; อื่นๆ
ko: 인터콤 통신 유형: 오디오 전용; 비디오; 기타
ro-RO: Tip comunicare interfon: Doar audio; Video; Altele
en: Intercom communication type: Audio-only; Video; Other
da: Intercom-kommunikationstype: Kun lyd; Video; Andet
de: Sprechanlage-Kommunikationstyp: Nur Audio; Video; Sonstiges
cs: Typ komunikace interkomu: Pouze audio; Video; Jiné
zh-CN: 对讲通信类型: 仅音频; 视频; 其他
nb: Intercom kommunikasjonstype: Kun lyd; Video; Annet
nl: Intercom communicatietype: Alleen audio; Video; Andere
el: Τύπος επικοινωνίας ενδοεπικοινωνίας: Μόνο ήχος; Βίντεο; Άλλο
it: Tipo di comunicazione interfono: Solo audio; Video; Altro
sl-SI: Tip komunikacije domofona: Samo zvočna; Video; Drugo
sv: Intercom-kommunikationstyp: Endast ljud; Video; Övrigt
fr: Type de communication de l’intercom: Audio uniquement; Vidéo; Autre
pl: Typ komunikacji interkomu: Tylko audio; Video; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de comunicação do interfone: Somente áudio; Vídeo; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de comunicação do intercomunicador: Apenas áudio; Vídeo; Outro
vi: Loại giao tiếp intercom: Chỉ âm thanh; Video; Khác